src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s72_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - eta: # 
    eta+V+Inf: eta
    eta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: etur
    eta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: át
    eta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ótu
    eta+V+Sup: etið
    eta+V+Inf: eta
